fi: Ilmastointilaitteen kompressorin öljytyyppi: Mineraali; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (esteri); SP-10; Muu
zh-CN: 空调压缩机油类型: 矿物油; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE（酯类）; SP-10; 其他
nb: AC-kompressoroljetype: Mineral; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (ester); SP-10; Annet
pl: Typ oleju sprężarki klimatyzacji: Mineralny; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (estrowy); SP-10; Inne
hu: Légkondicionáló kompresszorának olajtípusa: Ásványi; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (észter); SP-10; Egyéb
vi: Loại dầu máy nén điều hòa: Khoáng; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (este); SP-10; Khác
sk-SK: Typ oleja kompresora klimatizácie: Minerálny; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (ester); SP-10; Iné
bg-BG: Вид масло за компресор на климатик: Минерално; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (естер); SP-10; Други
ru: Тип масла компрессора кондиционера: Минеральное; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (эфирное); SP-10; Другое
ko: AC 컴프레서 오일 종류: 미네랄; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE(에스테르); SP-10; 기타
fr: Type d’huile pour compresseur de climatisation: Minérale; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (ester); SP-10; Autre
ja: エアコンコンプレッサーオイルの種類: 鉱物油; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (エステル); SP-10; その他
th: ประเภทน้ำมันคอมเพรสเซอร์แอร์รถยนต์: น้ำมันแร่; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (เอสเทอร์); SP-10; อื่นๆ
nl: AC-compressorolietype: Mineraal; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (ester); SP-10; Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta ulja za kompresor klima uređaja: Mineralno; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (ester); SP-10; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de óleo do compressor de ar-condicionado: Mineral; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (éster); SP-10; Outros
it: Tipo di olio per compressore AC: Minerale; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (estere); SP-10; Altro
de: Öltyp des Klimaanlagen-Kompressors: Mineral; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (Ester); SP-10; Andere
ro-RO: Tipul de ulei al compresorului de aer condiționat: Mineral; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (ester); SP-10; Altele
cs: Typ oleje pro kompresor klimatizace: Minerální; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (ester); SP-10; Ostatní
pt-PT: Tipo de óleo do compressor de ar condicionado: Mineral; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (éster); SP-10; Outro
tr: AC kompresör yağı tipi: Mineral; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (ester); SP-10; Diğer
el: Τύπος λαδιού συμπιεστή AC: Ορυκτό; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (εστέρας); SP-10; Άλλο
en: AC compressor oil type: Mineral; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (ester); SP-10; Other
lt-LT: Oro kondicionieriaus kompresoriaus alyvos tipas: Mineralinė; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (esterių); SP-10; Kita
sv: Typ av AC-kompressorolja: Mineral; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (ester); SP-10; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta olja za kompresor klimatske naprave: Mineralno; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (ester); SP-10; Drugo
es: Tipo de aceite para compresor de CA: Mineral; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (éster); SP-10; Otro
da: AC-kompressors olietype: Mineralsk; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (ester); SP-10; Anden
zh-TW: 空調壓縮機油類型: 礦物油; ND-8; ND-OIL 11; PAG; POE (酯類); SP-10; 其他